Utah statutes.
36-25-103.   Duties.
(1)  The committee shall:
(a)  serve as a liaison between the Governor's Rural Partnership Board, the
Utah Rural Development Council, rural economic development and planning
groups, and the Legislature;
(b)  recommend legislation for each annual general session of the Legislature
if the committee determines that modifications to current law are in the best
interest of the state and the economic and planning interests of rural Utah;
(c)  review the operations of the Office of Rural Development and other state
agencies involved in rural economic development and planning; and
(d)  help sponsor meetings and other opportunities for discussion with and
between rural economic development and planning interests.
(2)  In conducting its business, the committee shall comply with the rules of
legislative interim committees.
